Tennessee, session 114, HB2517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-101, is amended by adding the
following new subdivisions:
( ) "Monitored disease" means a disease that is endemic in the United States as
listed by the USDA;
( ) "Notifiable disease" means a disease and condition consisting of emergency
incidents, emerging disease incidents, and regulated disease incidents as listed by the
USDA;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-102, is amended by deleting
subdivision (4) and substituting:
(4)
(A) Recommend tests or vaccinations of animals within the state or
imported into the state for the purpose of protecting the health of animals; and
(B) Order tests or vaccinations of animals within the state or imported
into the state for the purpose of detecting or treating a notifiable disease or
monitored disease;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2517
012501
- 1 -